Missouri, session 2026, HB3211.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 338, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 338.088, to read as follows:
338.088. 1. The provisions of this section shall be known and may be cited as the
"Accessible Prescription Labels Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the term "prescription reader" means a device
that is designed to audibly convey the information contained on the label of a
prescription drug.
3. A pharmacy shall notify each person to whom a prescription drug is dispensed
that an accessible prescription label is available to the person upon request at no
additional cost.
4. If a person informs a pharmacy that the person identifies as a person who is
blind, visually impaired, or otherwise print-disabled, the pharmacy shall provide to the
person an accessible prescription label affixed to the bottle that:
(1) Is available to the person in a timely manner comparable to wait times for
other patients and lasts for at least the duration of the prescription;
(2) Is appropriate to the disability and preference of the person making the
request through use of audible, large print, or Braille labels;
(3) Conforms to the format-specific best practices established by the
Architectural and Transportation Barriers Compliance Board; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3211 2
(4) Contains all the label information required by state statute and federal law,
including cautions and warnings, and any information available to sighted persons
reading printed labels.
5. If a pharmacy provides a prescription reader to comply with the provisions of
this section, the pharmacy shall ensure that the prescription label is compatible with the
prescription reader.
6. The board of pharmacy shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement
this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that
is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔